Utah statutes.
36-23-105.   Applications -- Fees.

(1)  Representatives of occupations or professions who desire to have their occupation or profession licensed or regulated by the state may, prior to the introduction of any proposed legislation, submit an application for sunrise review to the Office of Legislative Research and General Counsel in a form approved by the committee.

(2)  Applicants shall submit a nonrefundable fee of $500 with each application.  All application fees shall be deposited in the General Fund.

